Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2030
Inheritance tax; annual statements.

The county judge and county clerk of each county shall annually make a statement in writing to the county attorney of the county, of the party from which or the party from whom they have reason to believe a tax under sections 77-2001 to 77-2037 is due and unpaid.

Laws 1901, c. 54, § 16, p. 421;

R.S.1913, § 6637;

C.S.1922, § 6168;

C.S.1929, § 77-2216;

R.S.1943, § 77-2030;

Laws 1976, LB 585, § 22.